Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0985.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 201. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local unit of government may provide by zoning ordinance for the regulation of land development and the establishment of 1 or more districts within its zoning jurisdiction which that regulate the use of land and structures to meet the needs of the this state's citizens for food, fiber, energy, and other natural resources, places of residence, recreation, industry, trade, service, and other uses of land, to ensure that use of the land is situated in appropriate locations and relationships, to limit the inappropriate overcrowding of land and congestion of population, transportation systems, and other public facilities, to facilitate adequate and efficient provision for transportation systems, sewage disposal, water, energy, education, recreation, and other public service and facility requirements, and to promote public health, safety, and welfare. (2) Except as otherwise provided under this act, the regulations shall must be uniform for each class of land or buildings, dwellings, and structures within a district. (3) A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local unit of government may provide under the zoning ordinance for the regulation of land development and the establishment of districts which that apply only to land areas and activities involved in a special program to achieve specific land management objectives and avert or solve specific land use problems, including the regulation of land development and the establishment of districts in areas subject to damage from flooding or beach erosion. (4) A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local unit of government may adopt land development regulations under the zoning ordinance designating or limiting the location, height, bulk, number of stories, uses, and size of dwellings, buildings, and structures that may be erected or altered, including tents and recreational vehicles. (5) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection and ending 2 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, a local unit of government shall not adopt or enforce a zoning ordinance under this act that regulates land development for residential use.